src/third-party/hunspell-dictionaries/es.aff
SFX   ambiar  mbienle ambiar
SFX   ambiar  mbienles ambiar
SFX   ancar  nquele ancar
SFX   ancar  nqueles ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenle ancar
SFX   ancar  nquenles ancar
SFX   arar  rele arar
SFX   arar  reles arar
SFX   arar  renle arar
SFX   arar  renles arar
SFX   asar  sele asar
SFX   asar  seles asar
SFX   asar  senle asar
SFX   asar  senles asar
SFX   astar  stele astar
SFX   astar  steles astar
SFX   astar  stenle astar
SFX   astar  stenles astar
SFX   azar  cele azar
SFX   azar  celes azar
SFX   azar  cenle azar
SFX   azar  cenles azar
SFX   egar  guele egar
SFX   egar  gueles egar
SFX   egar  guenle egar
SFX   egar  guenles egar
SFX   ejar  jele ejar
SFX   ejar  jeles ejar
SFX   ejar  jenle ejar
SFX   ejar  jenles ejar
SFX   entar  ntele entar
SFX   entar  nteles entar
SFX   entar  ntenle entar
SFX   entar  ntenles entar
SFX   e ar   ele e ar
SFX   e ar   eles e ar
SFX   e ar   enle e ar
SFX   e ar   enles e ar
SFX   esgar  sguele esgar
SFX   esgar  sgueles esgar
SFX   esgar  sguenle esgar
SFX   esgar  sguenles esgar
SFX   estar  stele estar
SFX   estar  steles estar
SFX   estar  stenle estar
SFX   estar  stenles estar
SFX   eter  tale eter
SFX   eter  tales eter
SFX   eter  tanle eter
SFX   eter  tanles eter
SFX   icar  quele icar
SFX   icar  queles icar
SFX   icar  quenle icar
SFX   icar  quenles icar
SFX   iflar  flele iflar
SFX   iflar  fleles iflar
SFX   iflar  flenle iflar
SFX   iflar  flenles iflar
SFX   igir  jale igir
SFX   igir  jales igir
SFX   igir  janle igir
SFX   igir  janles igir
SFX   imar  mele imar
SFX   imar  meles imar
SFX   imar  menle imar
SFX   imar  menles imar
SFX   irar  rele irar
SFX   irar  reles irar
SFX   irar  renle irar
SFX   irar  renles irar
SFX   irmar  rmele irmar
SFX   irmar  rmeles irmar
SFX   irmar  rmenle irmar
SFX   irmar  rmenles irmar
SFX   isar  sele isar
SFX   isar  seles isar
SFX   isar  senle isar
SFX   isar  senles isar
SFX   itar  tele itar
SFX   itar  teles itar
SFX   itar  tenle itar
SFX   itar  tenles itar
SFX   ocar  quele ocar
SFX   ocar  queles ocar
SFX   ocar  quenle ocar
SFX   ocar  quenles ocar
SFX   oger  jale oger
SFX   oger  jales oger
SFX   oger  janle oger
SFX   oger  janles oger
SFX   onar  nele onar
SFX   onar  neles onar
SFX   onar  nenle onar
SFX   onar  nenles onar
SFX   orgar  rguele orgar
SFX   orgar  rgueles orgar
SFX   orgar  rguenle orgar
SFX   orgar  rguenles orgar
SFX   ovar  vele ovar
SFX   ovar  veles ovar
SFX   ovar  venle ovar
SFX   ovar  venles ovar
SFX   uchar  cheles uchar
SFX   uchar  chele uchar
SFX   uchar  chenles uchar
SFX   uchar  chenle uchar
SFX   ultar  lteles ultar
SFX   ultar  ltele ultar
SFX   ultar  ltenles ultar
SFX   ultar  ltenle ultar
SFX   umar  meles umar
SFX   umar  mele umar
SFX   umar  menles umar
SFX   umar  menle umar
SFX   untar  nteles untar
SFX   untar  ntele untar
SFX   untar  ntenles untar
SFX   untar  ntenle untar
SFX   urar  reles urar
SFX   urar  rele urar
SFX   urar  renles urar
SFX   urar  renle urar
SFX   uscar  squeles uscar
SFX   uscar  squele uscar
SFX   uscar  squenles uscar
SFX   uscar  squenle uscar
SFX   ustar  steles ustar
SFX   ustar  stele ustar
SFX   ustar  stenles ustar
SFX   ustar  stenle ustar

SFX   Y 264
SFX   amar  memela amar
SFX   amar  memelas amar
SFX   amar  memelo amar
SFX   amar  memelos amar
SFX   amar  menmela amar
SFX   amar  menmelas amar
SFX   amar  menmelo amar
SFX   amar  menmelos amar
SFX   amar  mennosla amar
SFX   amar  mennoslas amar
SFX   amar  mennoslo amar
SFX   amar  mennoslos amar
SFX   amar  menosla amar
SFX   amar  menoslas amar
SFX   amar  menoslo amar
SFX   amar  menoslos amar
SFX   amar  mensela amar
SFX   amar  menselas amar
SFX   amar  menselo amar
SFX   amar  menselos amar
SFX   amar  mesela amar
SFX   amar  meselas amar
SFX   amar  meselo amar
SFX   amar  meselos amar
SFX   ear  emela ear
SFX   ear  emelas ear
SFX   ear  emelo ear
SFX   ear  emelos ear
SFX   ear  enmela ear
SFX   ear  enmelas ear
SFX   ear  enmelo ear
SFX   ear  enmelos ear
SFX   ear  ennosla ear
SFX   ear  ennoslas ear
SFX   ear  ennoslo ear
SFX   ear  ennoslos ear
SFX   ear  enosla ear
SFX   ear  enoslas ear
SFX   ear  enoslo ear
SFX   ear  enoslos ear
SFX   ear  ensela ear
SFX   ear  enselas ear
SFX   ear  enselo ear
SFX   ear  enselos ear
SFX   ear  esela ear
SFX   ear  eselas ear
SFX   ear  eselo ear
SFX   ear  eselos ear
SFX   edar  demela edar
SFX   edar  demelas edar
SFX   edar  demelo edar
SFX   edar  demelos edar
SFX   edar  denmela edar
SFX   edar  denmelas edar
SFX   edar  denmelo edar
SFX   edar  denmelos edar
SFX   edar  dennosla edar
SFX   edar  dennoslas edar
SFX   edar  dennoslo edar
SFX   edar  dennoslos edar
SFX   edar  denosla edar
SFX   edar  denoslas edar
SFX   edar  denoslo edar
SFX   edar  denoslos edar
SFX   edar  densela edar
SFX   edar  denselas edar
SFX   edar  denselo edar
SFX   edar  denselos edar
SFX   edar  desela edar
SFX   edar  deselas edar
SFX   edar  deselo edar
SFX   edar  deselos edar
SFX   eer  amela eer
SFX   eer  amelas eer
SFX   eer  amelo eer
SFX   eer  amelos eer
SFX   eer  anmela eer
SFX   eer  anmelas eer
SFX   eer  anmelo eer
SFX   eer  anmelos eer
SFX   eer  annosla eer
SFX   eer  annoslas eer
SFX   eer  annoslo eer
SFX   eer  annoslos eer
SFX   eer  anosla eer
SFX   eer  anoslas eer
SFX   eer  anoslo eer
SFX   eer  anoslos eer
SFX   eer  ansela eer
SFX   eer  anselas eer
SFX   eer  anselo eer
SFX   eer  anselos eer
SFX   eer  asela eer
SFX   eer  aselas eer
SFX   eer  aselo eer
SFX   eer  aselos eer
SFX   egar  guemela egar
SFX   egar  guemelas egar
SFX   egar  guemelo egar
SFX   egar  guemelos egar
SFX   egar  guenmela egar
SFX   egar  guenmelas egar
SFX   egar  guenmelo egar
SFX   egar  guenmelos egar
SFX   egar  guennosla egar
SFX   egar  guennoslas egar
SFX   egar  guennoslo egar
SFX   egar  guennoslos egar
SFX   egar  guenosla egar
SFX   egar  guenoslas egar
SFX   egar  guenoslo egar
SFX   egar  guenoslos egar
SFX   egar  guensela egar
SFX   egar  guenselas egar
SFX   egar  guenselo egar
SFX   egar  guenselos egar
SFX   egar  guesela egar
SFX   egar  gueselas egar
SFX   egar  gueselo egar
SFX   egar  gueselos egar
SFX   ejar  jemela ejar
SFX   ejar  jemelas ejar
SFX   ejar  jemelo ejar
SFX   ejar  jemelos ejar
SFX   ejar  jenmela ejar
SFX   ejar  jenmelas ejar
SFX   ejar  jenmelo ejar
SFX   ejar  jenmelos ejar
SFX   ejar  jennosla ejar
SFX   ejar  jennoslas ejar
SFX   ejar  jennoslo ejar
SFX   ejar  jennoslos ejar
SFX   ejar  jenosla ejar
SFX   ejar  jenoslas ejar
SFX   ejar  jenoslo ejar
SFX   ejar  jenoslos ejar
SFX   ejar  jensela ejar
SFX   ejar  jenselas ejar
SFX   ejar  jenselo ejar
SFX   ejar  jenselos ejar
SFX   ejar  jesela ejar
SFX   ejar  jeselas ejar
SFX   ejar  jeselo ejar
SFX   ejar  jeselos ejar
SFX   ender  ndamela ender
SFX   ender  ndamelas ender
SFX   ender  ndamelo ender
SFX   ender  ndamelos ender
SFX   ender  ndanmela ender
SFX   ender  ndanmelas ender
SFX   ender  ndanmelo ender
SFX   ender  ndanmelos ender
SFX   ender  ndannosla ender
SFX   ender  ndannoslas ender
SFX   ender  ndannoslo ender
SFX   ender  ndannoslos ender
SFX   ender  ndanosla ender
SFX   ender  ndanoslas ender
SFX   ender  ndanoslo ender
SFX   ender  ndanoslos ender
SFX   ender  ndansela ender
SFX   ender  ndanselas ender
SFX   ender  ndanselo ender
SFX   ender  ndanselos ender
SFX   ender  ndasela ender
SFX   ender  ndaselas ender
SFX   ender  ndaselo ender
SFX   ender  ndaselos ender
SFX   entar  ntemela entar
SFX   entar  ntemelas entar
SFX   entar  ntemelo entar
SFX   entar  ntemelos entar
SFX   entar  ntenmela entar
SFX   entar  ntenmelas entar
SFX   entar  ntenmelo entar
SFX   entar  ntenmelos entar
SFX   entar  ntennosla entar
SFX   entar  ntennoslas entar
SFX   entar  ntennoslo entar
SFX   entar  ntennoslos entar
SFX   entar  ntenosla entar
SFX   entar  ntenoslas entar
SFX   entar  ntenoslo entar
SFX   entar  ntenoslos entar
SFX   entar  ntensela entar
SFX   entar  ntenselas entar
SFX   entar  ntenselo entar
SFX   entar  ntenselos entar
